Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.343.390

Quorum—Failure to attend meetings.

A majority of all members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum. Absence of any board member from four consecutive regular meetings of the board, unless on account of sickness or authorized by resolution of the board, shall be sufficient cause for the remaining members of the board to declare by resolution that such board member position is vacated. In addition, vacancies shall occur as provided in RCW 42.12.010.

[ 1994 c 223 s 5; 1971 c 53 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.315.520, 28A.57.325.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 c 53: See note following RCW 28A.323.060.